Utah statutes.
31A-22-318.   Identification.

(1)  Any aftermarket crash part supplied by a nonoriginal equipment manufacturer for use in a motor vehicle in this state shall have the logo or name of the nonoriginal equipment manufacturer affixed or inscribed on the aftermarket crash part.

(2)  The nonoriginal equipment manufacturer's logo or name shall be visible after installation whenever practicable.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 8, 1995 General Session

